District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.97

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this part, no person shall use the words or terms “elevator contractor,” “elevator mechanic,” “licensed elevator contractor,” “licensed elevator mechanic,” “elevator inspector,” “licensed elevator inspector,” or any words describing an elevator specialty licensed by the Board to imply that the person is authorized to perform the services of an elevator contractor, elevator mechanic, or elevator inspector in the District.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2151(f), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2151(f) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).